Alabama, session 2026rs, HB589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 12-17-227.3 and 12-18-153 of the
Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§12-17-227.3
(a) Any active and contributing member of the District
Attorneys' Plan who, not more than one year prior to becoming
a member of the plan was a member of the Employees' Retirement
Page 1

a member of the plan was a member of the Employees' Retirement
HB589 INTRODUCED
System of Alabama or the Teachers' Retirement System of
Alabama, may elect to transfer his or her membership service
and accumulated contributions in the Employees' Retirement
System or the Teachers' Retirement System to the District
Attorneys' Plan.
(b) Any active and contributing member desiring to
transfer any membership service and accumulated contributions
under subsection (a) shall notify the Board of Control of the
Employees' Retirement System of his or her election to
transfer membership service and shall authorize the transfer
of the amount of his or her accumulated contributions to his
or her credit in the Employees' Retirement System or Teachers'
Retirement System to his or her account in the District
Attorneys' Plan.
(c) The Board of Control transferring the membership
service and contributions shall thereupon certify to the Board
of Control of the Employees' Retirement System and to the fund
the amount of contributions and service creditable to the
member at the time of separation from the transferring
retirement system. The member shall be credited in the fund
with the membership service and accumulated contributions so
certified.
(d) Any active and contributing member of the District
Attorneys' Plan who has previously withdrawn his or her funds
from the Employees' Retirement System, the Teachers'
Retirement System, the Judges' and Clerks' Plan, or the
District Attorneys' Plan or whose account has been terminated
due to five years absence shall have restored to him or her
Page 2

due to five years absence shall have restored to him or her
HB589 INTRODUCED
all creditable service; provided, that the judge or clerk
shall complete two years of contributing membership service
after becoming a member of The Judicial Retirement Fund and
shall repay the amount previously returned to him or her,
including compounded interest of eight percent to the date of
repayment, to the treasurer of the retirement system prior to
the date of retirement of the judge or clerk. Notwithstanding
the foregoing, any member who elects to purchase credit for
withdrawn service shall be eligible to purchase the credit
only to the extent that the member does not have credit
established with any other public retirement system for the
same period of service. Should any member have established
part credit with another public retirement system for any
period of withdrawn service, then that member shall only be
eligible to purchase that portion of the withdrawn service for
which the member does not otherwise have credit. In
determining credit with other public retirement systems,
coverage under the federal Social Security program may not be
considered.
(d)(e) Anything in this division to the contrary
notwithstanding, in the application of the foregoing
provisions of this section to a member whose membership
service includes a period of service as a district attorney
and a period of service in another employment classification,
the benefit rates applicable to a district attorney shall
apply to all membership service as a district attorney, and
the benefit rates applicable to the member's other employment
classification shall apply to membership service in such other
Page 3

classification shall apply to membership service in such other
HB589 INTRODUCED
classification. In all other respects, the pension under this
section shall be determined on the basis of the member's
employment classification at the time of his or her withdrawal
from service."
"§12-18-153
(a) Any active and contributing member of the Judges'
and Clerks' Plan who, not more than one year prior to becoming
a member of the plan was a member of the Employees' Retirement
System of Alabama or the Teachers' Retirement System of
Alabama, may elect to transfer his or her membership service
and accumulated contributions in the Employees' Retirement
System or the Teachers' Retirement System to the Judges' and
Clerks' Plan.
(b) Any active and contributing member desiring to
transfer any membership service and accumulated contributions
100 under subsection (a) shall notify the Board of Control of the
101 Employees' Retirement System of his or her election to
102 transfer membership service and shall authorize the transfer
103 of the amount of his or her accumulated contributions to his
104 or her credit in the Employees' Retirement System or Teachers'
105 Retirement System to his or her account in the Judges' and
106 Clerks' Plan.
107 (c) The Board of Control transferring the membership
108 service and contributions shall thereupon certify to the Board
109 of Control of the Employees' Retirement System and to the fund
110 the amount of contributions and service creditable to the
111 member at the time of separation from the transferring
112 retirement system. The member shall be credited in the fund
Page 4

retirement system. The member shall be credited in the fund
HB589 INTRODUCED
113 with the membership service and accumulated contributions so
114 certified.
115 (d) Any active and contributing member of the Judges'
116 and Clerks' Plan who has previously withdrawn his or her funds
117 from the Employees' Retirement System, the Teachers'
118 Retirement System, the Judges' and Clerks' Plan, or the
119 District Attorneys' Plan or whose account has been terminated
120 due to five years absence shall have restored to him or her
121 all creditable service; provided, that the judge or clerk
122 shall complete two years of contributing membership service
123 after becoming a member of the Judicial Retirement Fund and
124 shall repay the amount previously returned to him or her,
125 including compounded interest of eight percent to the date of
126 repayment, to the treasurer of the retirement system prior to
127 the date of retirement of the judge or clerk. Notwithstanding
128 the foregoing, any member who elects to purchase credit for
129 withdrawn service shall be eligible to purchase the credit
130 only to the extent that the member does not have credit
131 established with any other public retirement system for the
132 same period of service. Should any member have established
133 part credit with another public retirement system for any
134 period of withdrawn service, then the member shall only be
135 eligible to purchase that portion of the withdrawn service for
136 which the member does not otherwise have credit. In
137 determining credit with other public retirement systems,
138 coverage under the federal Social Security program may not be
139 considered.
140 (d)(e) Anything in this article to the contrary
Page 5

(d)(e) Anything in this article to the contrary
HB589 INTRODUCED
141 notwithstanding, in the application of the foregoing
142 provisions of this section to a member whose membership
143 service includes a period of service as a judge or clerk and a
144 period of service in another employment classification, the
145 benefit rates applicable to a judge or clerk shall apply to
146 all membership service as a judge or clerk, and the benefit
147 rates applicable to the member's other employment
148 classification shall apply to membership service in such other
149 classification. In all other respects, the pension under this
150 section shall be determined on the basis of the member's
151 employment classification at the time of his or her withdrawal
152 from service."
153 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
154 1, 2026.
Page 6